Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6274.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 112l. As used in sections 112m to 112p: (a) "Advisory group" means the stakeholder advisory group created by the department under section 112p. (b) "Basic health program" means a program certified by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under 42 USC 18051. (c) "Blueprint" means the written document described in 42 CFR 600.110. (d) "Federal poverty guidelines" means the federal poverty guidelines published annually in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under its authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902. (e) "Fund" means the basic health program fund created under section 112o. (f) "Standard health plan" means a health plan available through the basic health program. Sec. 112m. (1) Not later than 6 months after the department creates the advisory group under section 112p, the department, in consultation with the advisory group, shall create and present to the governor and legislature a report containing a proposed basic health program blueprint. (2) In developing the blueprint, the department and the advisory group shall consider and address all of the following objectives: (a) That the basic health program must serve, at a minimum, an eligible individual who meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is not more than 65 years of age. (ii) Is not eligible to enroll in an employer-sponsored health insurance that is affordable as determined under 26 USC 36B(c)(2)(C). (iii) Is either of the following: (A) A United States citizen with an annual income level at or above 133% but not greater than 200% of the federal poverty guidelines who does not qualify for the medical assistance program. (B) A lawfully present noncitizen with an annual income level below 200% of the federal poverty guidelines, including an individual who would qualify for this state's medical assistance program but for the individual's immigration status or the duration of the individual's residency in the United States. (b) Whether an eligible individual for the basic health program has the option of enrolling in a standard health plan. (c) Whether an eligible individual for the basic health program is subject to deductibles, coinsurance, copayments, or other cost-sharing requirements. (d) That an eligible individual for the basic health program whose income is below 133% of the federal poverty guidelines shall not be required to pay premiums. (e) That premiums for an eligible individual for the basic health program whose annual income level is at or above 133% of the federal poverty guidelines must be based on a sliding scale that ensures that the premiums are not greater than the premiums an eligible individual would pay for a qualified health plan purchased on the health insurance exchange minus the premium tax credit described in 26 USC 36B. (f) That the cost of the basic health program must be maintained at a fixed rate of growth annually. (3) Subject to subsection (4), the department shall develop a basic health program blueprint and, after presenting the proposed blueprint to the governor and the legislature, may submit the blueprint to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services for certification under 42 USC 18051 and 42 CFR 600.110. The blueprint must include this state's program design choices and a description of the operations and management of the basic health program and its compliance with applicable federal requirements. In developing the blueprint, the department shall consult with the advisory group to advise and assist the department in identifying program design options expected to improve the delivery of quality health care to eligible individuals, including, but not limited to, alternative approaches for achieving the objectives of the basic health program as described under subsection (2). (4) The department may not submit the basic health program blueprint for federal certification until the department has presented the proposed blueprint to the governor and the legislature. (5) On certification of the basic health program by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, the department may do all of the following: (a) Enter into contracts with managed care organizations, health plans, or other entities to deliver covered health services to eligible individuals under the basic health program. Contracts with managed care organizations, health plans, or other entities must comply with federal basic health program standards under 42 CFR 600.410 to 600.420, including network adequacy, nondiscrimination, medical loss ratio of at least 85%, and consumer protection requirements. The department may request an exception from the 2-plan choice requirement under 42 CFR 600.420(a) if a geographic region is served by only 1 medical assistance managed care entity. (b) Enroll eligible individuals in the basic health program in accordance with federal and state requirements. (c) Take any necessary actions to administer the basic health program consistent with the approved blueprint, federal law, and state law. (6) Beginning 1 year after the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services certifies the basic health program, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature that provides all of the following information: (a) The number of eligible individuals enrolled in the basic health program. (b) Expenditures from the fund. (c) Premium levels and cost-sharing arrangements. (d) Health outcomes and access to care for the basic health program participants. (e) Any recommendations for legislative action to improve the program. (f) Enrollment data, including enrollment by federal poverty level band and immigration status. (g) Health outcomes, access measures, and coverage churn metrics for program participants. (7) The department may promulgate rules as necessary to implement and administer the basic health program. Sec. 112n. (1) The department shall coordinate eligibility and enrollment systems between the medical assistance program and the basic health program to ensure seamless coverage for individuals whose income fluctuates near the medical assistance eligibility threshold. The department shall adopt policies that minimize gaps in coverage and prevent unnecessary disenrollment. (2) If an individual becomes ineligible for the medical assistance program but is eligible for the basic health program, the department shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, automatically enroll the individual in a standard health plan under the basic health program, unless the individual affirmatively opts out. (3) Cost-sharing requirements for standard health plans offered through the basic health program may include reduced deductibles and copayments. Cost-sharing requirements are as follows: (a) No premiums or cost-sharing for an eligible individual with a household income below 133% of the federal poverty guidelines. (b) For an eligible individual with a household income of 133% to 200% of the federal poverty guidelines, premiums and cost-sharing must comply with federal basic health program requirements and do not exceed what the individual would have paid for qualified health plan coverage after applicable premium tax credits and cost-sharing reductions. (4) The department shall ensure that an eligible individual is not disenrolled from the basic health program for failure to pay premiums until at least a 90-day grace period has passed and reasonable efforts to notify and assist the eligible individual have been made. (5) The department shall publish an annual report on the department's website detailing revenues, expenditures, enrollment trends, and program performance metrics for the basic health program. (6) The department shall provide a 12-month continuous eligibility for an eligible individual, unless the eligible individual reaches 65 years of age, moves out of this state, or voluntarily disenrolls. (7) If an eligible individual transitions from the medical assistance program to the basic health program, the department shall provide an opt-out notice to the eligible individual before automatic enrollment in a standard health plan. Sec. 112o. (1) The basic health program fund is created in the state treasury. The basic health program fund is a trust fund. The department shall appoint trustees, including the state treasurer, the chief financial officer of the department, and this state's medical assistance director, to oversee the fund. (2) The state treasurer shall credit to the fund federal money received under 42 USC 18051 and any state appropriations for the basic health program. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. The department shall conduct an independent audit of the fund at least once every 3 years and maintain all records in accordance with state and federal medical assistance requirements. (5) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only to plan, implement, and administer the basic health program. The trustees shall certify annually that fund expenditures comply with 42 CFR 600.710 and are used exclusively for the basic health program. (6) The department shall publish an annual trust fund report detailing revenues, expenditures, and the fund balance within 10 days of the trustees' approval. Sec. 112p. (1) Not later than 6 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall create an advisory group that consists of, at a minimum, all of the following individuals: (a) An advocate for low-income individuals and families. (b) A consumer health care advocate. (c) A representative of health care provider groups. (d) A representative of community-based or nonprofit organizations that serve the eligible individuals' population. (e) A representative of the health insurance industry. (2) The advisory group shall review the basic health program blueprint, assist the department with public comment processes and stakeholder engagement, and advise the department on implementation and program improvements.